West Virginia, session 2025, SB229.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 12. West Virginia Sexual Assault Survivors' Child Protection Act. §49-12-1. Purpose and intent. The purpose of this Act is to protect the rights and welfare of children conceived as a result of sexual assault and their mothers. This Act recognizes the trauma and hardship faced by survivors of sexual assault and seeks to prevent further harm caused by continued interaction with the perpetrator. §49-12-2. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act:(a) "Sexual assault" refers to any nonconsensual sexual act prohibited by West Virginia law.(b) "Parental rights" include, but are not limited to, custody, visitation, and decision-making rights regarding the child. §49-12-3. Termination of parental rights. (a) If a court finds by clear and convincing evidence that a child was conceived as a result of sexual assault, the court shall terminate any parental rights of the perpetrator. (b) The termination of parental rights under this section shall not affect the obligation of the perpetrator to pay child support unless waived by the survivor. §49-12-4. Procedure. (a) A petition to terminate parental rights under this section may be filed by the survivor or on behalf of the child. (b) The court shall expedite proceedings under this section and protect the privacy and safety of the survivor and child throughout the process. §49-12-5. Implementation. The Department of Health and Human Resources, in cooperation with local law enforcement agencies and victim advocacy organizations, shall develop guidelines for the implementation of this Act. These guidelines shall include procedures for filing petitions, conducting hearings, and providing support services for survivors and children affected by sexual assault.